Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. In General

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision on the establishment of charitable, reformatory and penal institutions by the state, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to county hospitals, see §§

18-8-101

to

18-8-301

.

For authority of counties, municipalities, school, hospital or other special district to establish and operate hospitals and related medical facilities, see §

18-8-108

.

For provisions concerning other state institutions generally, see title 25.

As to state hospital for the insane, see §§

25-10-101

to

25-10-305

.

§§ 35-2-101 through 35-2-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to licensing and operation of hospitals, health care facilities and health services, see article 9 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1948, Sp. Sess., ch. 7, §§ 1 through 6, and 8 through 13, related to hospitals and related facilities, and provided regulations regarding licenses, inspections, review and appeal of decisions, standards, classifications, acceptance of funds or grants, and violations.

§ 35-2-113.
Doctors of medicine, osteopathy, chiropractic, dentistry or podiatrists may practice in public hospitals.

Any hospital owned by the state, or any hospital district, county or city thereof, and any hospital whose support, either in whole or in part, is derived from public funds, shall be open for practice to doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathy, doctors of chiropractic, doctors of dentistry and podiatrists, who are licensed to practice medicine or surgery, chiropractic, dentistry or podiatry in this state. Provided, however, that these hospitals by appropriate bylaws shall promulgate reasonable and uniform rules and regulations covering staff admissions and staff privileges. Admission shall not be predicated solely upon the type of degree of the applicant and the governing body shall consider the competency and character of each applicant.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 25, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-97.1; Laws 1981, ch. 84, § 1; 1991, ch. 24, § 1.

Property interest. —

Because Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-2-113

created a procedural right without a mandated outcome, the state-law interest in hospital admission was not protected under the Due Process Clause. Any consideration for admission that plaintiff dentist had did not constitute a protected property interest.
Ripley v. Wyo. Med. Ctr., Inc., 559 F.3d 1119,

2009 U.S. App. LEXIS 5370

(10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 558 U.S. 879, 130 S. Ct. 287, 175 L. Ed. 2d 135, 2009 U.S. LEXIS 6204 (U.S. 2009).

Evidence supported revocation of privileges. —

Substantial evidence supported a decision by a hospital board of trustees to revoke a physician's medical staff privileges because the record contained ample evidence of the physician's inability to work cooperatively with others, to relate to others in a civil, collegial, and courteous manner, and to refrain from disruptive conduct; all six incidents of misconduct involved anger, mistreatment of staff, and disruptive behavior.
Guier v. Teton County Hosp. Dist., 2011 WY 31, 248 P.3d 623,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exclusion of, or discrimination against, physician or surgeon by hospital, 28 ALR5th 107.

§ 35-2-114.
Liability insurance authorized; effect of procurement.

The governing body of any county memorial hospital, hospital district or other governmental agency which provides health care services or mental health services within this state may procure any type or amount of liability insurance coverage as it deems prudent to cover any loss by reason of liability for damages on account of injury, sickness or disease, death, property loss or damage. This shall not be construed as creating a liability of such county memorial hospital, hospital district or governmental agency insuring itself, nor shall the failure to procure any such insurance be construed as creating any liability of the county memorial hospital, hospital district or other governmental agency.

To the extent of any such insurance coverage procured by a county memorial hospital, hospital district or other governmental agency providing health care or mental health services, the defense of governmental immunity is expressly waived. All defenses which would be available to a private corporation in an action against the corporation are available to the county memorial hospital, hospital district or other health care governmental agency.

None of these provisions shall be construed as waiving the individual immunity of any employee, board member or officer of a county memorial hospital, hospital district or other health care governmental agency when the person is acting within the scope of his employment or authority.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-97.2.

Cited

in

Diamond Surface, Inc. v. Cleveland, 963 P.2d 996,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Coverage and exclusions under hospital professional liability or indemnity policy, 65 ALR3d 969.

Recovery for mental or emotional distress resulting from injury to, or death of, member of plaintiff's family arising from physician's or hospital's wrongful conduct, 77 ALR3d 447.

Liability of hospital or similar institution for giving erroneous notification of patient's death, 77 ALR3d 501.

Hospital's liability for negligence in failing to review or supervise treatment given by doctor, or to require consultation, 12 ALR4th 57.

Liability of hospital, physician or other individual medical practitioner for injury or death resulting from blood transfusion, 20 ALR4th 136.

Hospital liability as to diagnosis and care of patients in emergency room, 58 ALR5th 613.

§ 35-2-115.
Emergency services.

Emergency service and care shall be provided, at the regularly established charges of the hospital, to any person requesting such services or care, or for whom such services or care is requested, for any condition in which the person is in danger of loss of life, or serious injury or illness, at any hospital licensed in the state of Wyoming that maintains and operates emergency services to the public when such hospital has appropriate facilities and qualified personnel available to provide such services or care.

Neither the hospital, its employees, nor any physician licensed to practice in the state of Wyoming shall be held liable in any action arising out of a refusal to render emergency services or care at such licensed hospital, if ordinary medical care and skill is exercised in determining the condition of the person, and a decision is made that such refusal shall not result in any permanent illness or injury to such person or a decision is made that sufficient qualified personnel are not available to treat said person, or a decision is made that facilities or equipment are not available to treat said person or in determining the appropriateness of the facilities, the qualifications and availability of personnel to render such services.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 118, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-97.3.

Quoted

in

Distad v. Cubin, 633 P.2d 167,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 370

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of hospital for injury to person invited or permitted to accompany patient during emergency room treatment, 90 ALR4th 478.

§§ 35-2-116 and 35-2-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 63, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 89, § 1, related to tax supported health care facilities.

§ 35-2-118.
[Reserved.]

Reserved.

§§ 35-2-119 and 35-2-120.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1981, ch. 2, § 1, and Laws 1981, ch. 3, § 1, related to suspension of nursing home admissions, and suspension or revocation of licenses.

§ 35-2-121.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 52, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 63, § 1, related to tax supported health care facilities.